Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-1007.06
Poverty allowance; calculation.

(1) For each school fiscal year, the department shall determine the poverty allowance for each school district that meets the requirements of this section and section 79-1007.07. Each school district shall designate a maximum poverty allowance on a form prescribed by the department on or before October 15 of the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated. The school district may decline to participate in the poverty allowance by providing the department with a maximum poverty allowance of zero dollars on such form on or before October 15 of the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated.

(2) The poverty allowance for each school district shall equal the lesser of:

(a) The maximum amount designated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section by the school district in the local system, if such school district designated a maximum amount, for the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated; or

(b) The sum of:

(i) The statewide average general fund operating expenditures per formula student multiplied by 0.0375 then multiplied by the poverty students comprising more than five percent and not more than ten percent of the formula students in the school district; plus

(ii) The statewide average general fund operating expenditures per formula student multiplied by 0.0750 then multiplied by the poverty students comprising more than ten percent and not more than fifteen percent of the formula students in the school district; plus

(iii) The statewide average general fund operating expenditures per formula student multiplied by 0.1125 then multiplied by the poverty students comprising more than fifteen percent and not more than twenty percent of the formula students in the school district; plus

(iv) The statewide average general fund operating expenditures per formula student multiplied by 0.1500 then multiplied by the poverty students comprising more than twenty percent and not more than twenty-five percent of the formula students in the school district; plus

(v) The statewide average general fund operating expenditures per formula student multiplied by 0.1875 then multiplied by the poverty students comprising more than twenty-five percent and not more than thirty percent of the formula students in the school district; plus

(vi) The statewide average general fund operating expenditures per formula student multiplied by 0.2250 then multiplied by the poverty students comprising more than thirty percent of the formula students in the school district.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 79;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 19;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 28;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 27;

Laws 2015, LB525, § 19;

Laws 2018, LB1081, § 12.
July 19, 2018